Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1164.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2943, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2943. Provider subcontracts; hospital reimbursement; change of ownership A. Subcontracts for services rendered by providers pursuant to section 36-2940 shall be awarded through competitive statewide proposals in as nearly the same manner as that provided in section 41-2534. If there is not a sufficient number of qualified proposals, a subcontract may be negotiated with a provider and shall be awarded pursuant to section 41-2536. In order to deliver covered services to members who are enrolled or expected to be enrolled in the system within a county, the program contractor may negotiate and award without bid a provider subcontract if during the contract year there is an insufficient number of subcontracts awarded to providers. The term of the subcontract shall not extend beyond the next bid and subcontract award process as provided in this section, and the subcontract shall be at rates no greater than the weighted average rates for the appropriate level of care paid to similar providers in the same county. This section does not allow a program contractor to forego forgo the competitive bid process pursuant to section 41-2534 unless there is an unanticipated increase in members enrolled in the system or a decrease in available beds brought about by the closure of a facility operated by a provider that is unable to be absorbed by current contracting providers located in the same general area. Before soliciting subcontracts without the competitive bid process, the program contractor shall receive approval from the director. B. Hospitals that render care to members shall be paid by the program contractor as prescribed in section 36-2903.01,  or such at a lower rate as may be negotiated by the program contractor. C. The director may ensure through the subcontracts pursuant to subsection A of this section that at least ten per cent percent of the members are provided services pursuant to this article on a capitation basis. D. A claim for an authorized service submitted by a licensed skilled nursing facility, an assisted living Arizona long-term care system provider or a home and community based Arizona long-term care system provider that renders care to members pursuant to this article shall be adjudicated within thirty calendar days after receipt by the program contractor. Any clean claim for an authorized service provided to a member that is not paid within thirty calendar days after the claim is received accrues interest at the rate of one per cent percent per month from the date the claim is submitted. The interest is prorated on a daily basis and must be paid by the program contractor at the time the clean claim is paid. E. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, when there is a change of ownership of a licensed skilled nursing facility or an assisted living facility that is NOT IN A SUSPENSION, TERMINATION OR PAYMENT HOLD, THAT HAS AN ACTIVE PROVIDER ENROLLMENT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION and that continues to provide services under this article, at the new owner's request the administration and its program contractors shall continue to process claims for SERVICEs rendered to members and make payments in accordance with subsection D of this section under the previous owner's aRIZONA HEALTH CARE COST CONTAINMENT SYSTEM number and subcontracts until the new owner's system enrollment and contracting process is completed.  tHE CURRENT OWNER OR NEW OWNER SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE ADMINISTRATION AT LEAST SIXTY DAYS BEFORE AN ANTICIPATED CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP and respond to all provider enrollment requests within ten business days. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.